Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1430
Legislative findings and intent.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to improve transparency, accountability, and data-informed policymaking regarding compensation practices at Nebraska public postsecondary institutions.

(2) The Legislature finds that comprehensive, publicly available salary and benefits data, including data for administrators, instructional faculty, and adjunct faculty, is necessary to evaluate workforce competitiveness, recruitment and retention challenges, compensation equity, and long-term fiscal sustainability in higher education.

Laws 2026, LB956, § 1.
July 1, 2026